Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,359
Modification
of all-terrain vehicle or utility-type
vehicle; prohibited.

No person shall:

(1) Equip the exhaust system of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle with
a cutout, bypass, or similar device;

(2) Operate an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle with an exhaust system
so modified; or

(3) Operate an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle with the spark arrester
removed or modified except for use in closed-course competition events.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2805;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 455;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 43.